Massachusetts, session 194th, S239.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 270, Section 22, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by
inserting the following section:-
Section 22(c)(9) A smoking bar, if the smoking bar maintains a valid permit pursuant to
this section, may be located within a gaming establishment possessing a valid category 1 license
and category 2 license issued pursuant to M.G.L. Chapter 23K.
of 1